Hawaii statutes.
[§421J-6] Robert's Rules of Order. All
association and board of directors meetings shall be conducted in accordance
with the most current edition of Robert's Rules of Order, Newly Revised. [L
1997, c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next